Hawaii statutes.
§580-11 Care, custody, education, and
maintenance of children pendente lite. During the pendency of any action
for divorce or separation the court may make such orders concerning the care,
custody, education, and maintenance of the minor children of the parties to the
action as law and justice may require and may enforce the orders by summary
process. The court may revise and amend the orders from time to time. [L 1931,
c 49, §1; RL 1935, §4474; RL 1945, §12225; RL 1955, §324-36; HRS §580-11; am L
1973, c 211, §5(g)]

Cross References

Custody, see §571-46.

Case Notes

Cited: 35 H. 382, 383; 38 H. 233, 235.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next